North Dakota, session 69, HB1014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from federal funds, to the protection and
advocacy project for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the protection and advocacy project, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Protection and advocacy operations $7,791,270 $417,060 $8,208,330
New and vacant FTE pool 0 361,911 361,911
Total all funds $7,791,270 $778,971 $8,570,241
Less other funds 4,359,417 387,871 4,747,288
Total general fund $3,431,853 $391,100 $3,822,953
Full-time equivalent positions 28.50 1.00 29.50
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Accrued leave payments $19,288 $0 $19,288
Total $19,288 $0 $19,288
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
protection and advocacy project may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line
item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds
from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the protection and advocacy operations line item in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved
by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1014 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1014.
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 9 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State